apertium-en-af.af.dix
    <pardef n="/goed__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>goed</l>
	  <r>goed<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>goeie</l>
	  <r>goed<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>beter</l>
	  <r>goed<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>beste</l>
	  <r>goed<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="arm__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e> 
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>er</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ste</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>




    <pardef n="maklik__adj">
      <!-- begin cheating -->
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e> 
      <!-- end cheating -->
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e> 
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>er</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ste</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


<!-- not sure if we need sint in the adj.pred and adj.attr 
    <pardef n="maklik__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e> 
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>er</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ste</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
-->
    <pardef n="klein__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e> 
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>er</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ster</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="gou/d__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>d</l>
	  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>er</l>
	  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>dste</l>
	  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Winterstream -->

    <pardef n="binne__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ste</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="wy/d__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>d</l>
	  <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bre/ed__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ed</l>
	  <r>ed<s n="adj"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>eë</l>
	  <r>ed<s n="adj"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dik__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e> 
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ker</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ste</l>
	  <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="la/ag__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ag</l>
	  <r>ag<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pred"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ë</l>
	  <r>ag<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="attr"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>ër</l>
	  <r>ag<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>agste</l>
	  <r>ag<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- Nomen -->

    <pardef n="poësie__n__unc">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="unc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="afsto/f__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
	  <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wwe</l>
	  <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kal/f__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
	  <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wers</l>
	  <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="pa/d__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
	  <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aie</l>
	  <r>d<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sa/ag__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ag</l>
	  <r>ag<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
	  <r>ag<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bo/om__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
	  <r>om<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
	  <r>om<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="l/id__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
	  <r>id<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ede</l>
	  <r>id<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="minu/ut__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ut</l>
	  <r>ut<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
	  <r>ut<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="proble/em__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
	  <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
	  <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="appèl__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l/>
         <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
       <l>le</l>
       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bier__n">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bed__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dens</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hoof__n">
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l/>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="paramedi/kus__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kus</l>
	  <r>kus<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ci</l>
	  <r>kus<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="ta/al__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>al</l>
	  <r>al<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
	  <r>al<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bulkalf"><i>bulkal</i><par n="kal/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="olifantkalf"><i>olifantkal</i><par n="kal/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seekalf"><i>seekal</i><par n="kal/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="speenkalf"><i>speenkal</i><par n="kal/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="minuut"><i>minu</i><par n="minu/ut__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rekruut"><i>rekru</i><par n="minu/ut__n"/></e>
    <e lm="evolusionisme"><i>evolusionisme</i><par n="poësie__n__unc"/></e>
    <e lm="militarisme"><i>militarisme</i><par n="poësie__n__unc"/></e>
    <e lm="polonium"><i>polonium</i><par n="poësie__n__unc"/></e>
    <e lm="bevorderingsbeleid"><i>bevorderingsbeleid</i><par n="bier__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dryfstroom"><i>dryfstro</i><par n="bo/om__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seebed"><i>seebed</i><par n="bed__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rykdom"><i>rykd</i><par n="bo/om__n"/></e>
    <e lm="serwituut"><i>serwitu</i><par n="minu/ut__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bad"><i>bad</i><par n="bed__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krul"><i>krul</i><par n="appèl__n"/></e>
    <e lm="neerlaag"><i>neerla</i><par n="sa/ag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vloeistof"><i>vloeisto</i><par n="afsto/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="idioom"><i>idioom</i><par n="bo/om__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lid"><i>l</i><par n="l/id__n"/></e>
    <e lm="neus"><i>neus</i><par n="bier__n"/></e>
    <e lm="straf"><i>stra</i><par n="afsto/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stof"><i>sto</i><par n="afsto/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tafelblad"><i>tafelblad</i><par n="bed__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vloeistof"><i>vloeist</i><par n="afsto/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="navraag"><i>navra</i><par n="sa/ag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pleknaamkunde"><i>pleknaamkunde</i><par n="poësie__n__unc"/></e>
    <e lm="heethoof"><i>heethoof</i><par n="hoof__n"/></e>
    <e lm="medusahoof"><i>medusahoof</i><par n="hoof__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Zoeloehoof"><i>Zoeloehoof</i><par n="hoof__n"/></e>
    <e lm="afwateringskanaal"><i>afwateringskana</i><par n="ta/al__n"/></e>
    <e lm="epileptikus"><i>epilepti</i><par n="paramedi/kus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klinikus"><i>klini</i><par n="paramedi/kus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spastikus"><i>spasti</i><par n="paramedi/kus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leiersgroep"><i>leiersgroep</i><par n="bier__n"/></e>
    <e lm="inligtingsprobleem"><i>inligtingsproble</i><par n="proble/em__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rentekoersprobleem"><i>rentekoersproble</i><par n="proble/em__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boumateriaal"><i>boumateria</i><par n="ta/al__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tekstielmateriaal"><i>tekstielmateria</i><par n="ta/al__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rekenaarsisteem"><i>rekenaarsiste</i><par n="proble/em__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fietspad"><i>fietspad</i><par n="pa/d__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plaaspad"><i>plaaspad</i><par n="pa/d__n"/></e>
    <e lm="voetpad"><i>voetpad</i><par n="pa/d__n"/></e>
    <e lm="steensaag"><i>steensa</i><par n="sa/ag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atol"><i>atol</i><par n="appèl__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oliekol"><i>oliekol</i><par n="appèl__n"/></e>
    <e lm="voortreflik"><i>voortreflik</i><par n="maklik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="blas"><i>blas</i><par n="maklik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="magtig"><i>magtig</i><par n="maklik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="slordig"><i>slordig</i><par n="maklik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="koud"><i>kou</i><par n="gou/d__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dik"><i>dik</i><par n="dik__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="laag"><i>la</i><par n="la/ag__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kalkagtig"><i>kalkagtig</i><par n="arm__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="onvolledig"><i>onvolledig</i><par n="arm__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="wyd"><i>wy</i><par n="wy/d__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="wêreldwyd"><i>wêreldwy</i><par n="wy/d__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="breed"><i>bre</i><par n="bre/ed__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="linker"><i>linker</i><par n="binne__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="regter"><i>regter</i><par n="binne__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="binne"><i>binne</i><par n="binne__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="middel"><i>middel</i><par n="binne__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="goed"><i/><par n="/goed__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="goud"><i>gou</i><par n="gou/d__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="klein"><i>klein</i><par n="klein__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="arm"><i>arm</i><par n="arm__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="koel"><i>koel</i><par n="arm__adj"/></e>
